Wyoming, session 2025, SF0134.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 35-12-120 is created to read:

35-12-120. Industrial facilities; wildlife mitigation
and impact payments.

SF0134

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0266
(a) Upon receiving a request for information and
recommendations from the division under W.S. 35-12-110(b)
for the siting of an industrial facility, each eligible
entity may apply to the council for a wildlife impact
payment from the permit applicant, in accordance with all
of the following:

(i) The eligible entity seeking a wildlife
impact payment shall complete and submit an application in
a form and manner determined by the council;

(ii) The eligible entity shall provide the
following information on its application:

(A) The specific impacts on wildlife as a
result of the industrial facility, and evidence supporting
those impacts;

(B) Efforts that the eligible entity can
take to mitigate or otherwise reduce the impacts on
wildlife as a result of the industrial facility;

SF0134

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0266
(C) The mitigated and unmitigated impacts
that the construction of the industrial facility will have
on wildlife;

(D) The estimated dollar amount of the
unmitigated impacts on wildlife;

(E) Any other information required by rule
of the council.

(iii) Before submitting an application under
this subsection, the eligible entity may negotiate with the
applicant of the industrial facility to determine and agree
upon the amount of the wildlife impact payment to be made
to the eligible entity. Upon entering an agreement under
this paragraph:

(A) The eligible entity shall submit a
written report to the council on reaching an agreement with
the applicant and the amount of the wildlife impact payment
that the applicant will make to the eligible entity;

SF0134

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0266
(B) The council shall provide notice of the
agreement to the entities specified in W.S. 35-12-110(a),
publish notice as required under W.S. 35-12-110(a)(ii) and
accept public comment on the proposed payment at the public
hearing held under W.S. 35-12-110(f)(i). The council shall
not otherwise accept evidence of the wildlife impacts at
the hearing. Subsections (b) and (c) of this section shall
not apply to agreements reached under this paragraph;

(C) The council shall include in its order
under W.S. 35-12-113(a) the amount of the wildlife impact
payment that the applicant shall make to the eligible
entity, subject to subsections (e) through (h) of this
section.

(b) Upon receiving an application under this section
from an eligible entity, the council shall, at the public
hearing held under W.S. 35-12-110(f)(i), receive evidence
from the eligible entity and the applicant on the impacts
to wildlife.

SF0134

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0266
(c) The council shall review the evidence of the
impacts and determine, applying a preponderance of the
evidence standard:

(i) The total dollar amount of the unmitigated
impacts on wildlife as a result of constructing the
industrial facility;

(ii) The total dollar amount of the wildlife
impact payment, including specific findings of fact
detailing the basis for the total dollar amount
determination;

(iii) If requested by the eligible entity, the
council's justification for rejecting, in whole or in part,
an eligible entity's requested wildlife impact payment;

(iv) The schedule of the wildlife impact
payment.

(d) The council shall state, in the order issued
under W.S. 35-12-113(a), any information provided by the
eligible entity under paragraph (a)(iii) of this section or
SF0134

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0266
the determinations made under subsection (c) of this
section.

(e) Wildlife impact payments made and required under
this section shall be:

(i) Made by the applicant in accordance with the
council's order for the wildlife impact payment included
within the order issued under W.S. 35-12-113(a);

(ii) Expended by the eligible entity on
mitigating the identified unmitigated impacts on wildlife
as a result of constructing the industrial facility.

(f) In awarding or approving a wildlife impact
payment under this section, the council shall, in the order
or decision approving a permit, include the terms specified
in this section and any other conditions or requirements
for the wildlife impact payment that the council deems
necessary.

(g) The applicant shall make all wildlife impact
payments as required in the council's decision or order.
SF0134

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0266
The applicant shall make the payment to the state
treasurer, who shall distribute the payment to the eligible
entity under the schedule and other terms specified by the
council.

(h) Each eligible entity receiving a wildlife impact
payment under this section shall keep records of all
wildlife impact payments received and all expenditures made
with funds received from the wildlife impact payment. Each
eligible entity shall, upon request, provide to the
council, the director or the administrator any or all
records kept by the eligible entity under this subsection.

(j) Wildlife impact payments made under this section
shall be separate from any impact assistance payment made
under W.S. 39-15-111(c) and (d) and 39-16-111(d) and (e).

Section 2. W.S. 9-15-104 by creating a new subsection
(m), 18-5-509(a), 18-5-511(a)(iv), 35-11-109(a)(xi),
35-11-110(e), 35-11-2101(e), 35-12-102(a) by creating a new
paragraph (xvi), 35-12-105(c) and 35-12-110(b) by creating
a new paragraph (xxiv) are amended to read:

SF0134

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0266
9-15-104. Wildlife and natural resource trust account
board established; terms; meetings; duties.

(m) The board may seek wildlife impact payments from
an applicant for an industrial facility in accordance with
W.S. 35-12-120. The board shall expend any payments
received under W.S. 35-12-120 in accordance with the
requirements of W.S. 35-12-120 and any terms specified by
the industrial siting council.

18-5-509. Referral.

(a) Any board of county commissioners which receives
an application to permit a wind energy facility or solar
energy facility which does not meet the definition of an
industrial facility as defined in W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E)
or (G) may refer the facility to the industrial siting
council for additional permitting consistent with the
requirements of the Industrial Development Information and
Siting Act, W.S. 35-12-101 through 35-12-119 35-12-120, but
the provisions of W.S. 39-15-111 and 39-16-111 shall not
apply. A referral shall be made only when a board of
county commissioners finds there are potentially
SF0134

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0266
significant adverse environmental, social or economic
issues which the county board of commissioners does not
have the expertise to consider or authority to address.

18-5-511. Revocation or suspension of permit.

(a) A permit may be revoked or suspended for:

(iv) Failure of the proposed facility to receive
a required permit from the industrial siting council
pursuant to the Industrial Development Information and
Siting Act, W.S. 35-12-101 through 35-12-119 35-12-120;

35-11-109. Powers and duties of director.

(a) In addition to any other powers and duties
imposed by law, the director of the department shall:

(xi) Designate authorized officers, employees or
representatives of the department to monitor the air,
water, and land quality, and solid waste management
operations of all facilities which have been granted
permits under W.S. 35-12-101 through 35-12-119 35-12-120,
SF0134

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0266
for assuring continuing compliance with conditions and
requirements of their permits and for discovering and
preventing noncompliance with the permits or violations of
law;

35-11-110. Powers of administrators of the divisions.

(e) The administrator of the industrial siting
division shall enforce and administer the provisions of
W.S. 35-12-101 through 35-12-119 35-12-120. He shall have
the powers set forth in paragraph (a)(x) of this section.

35-11-2101. Advanced nuclear reactors; requirements.

(e) The provisions of the Industrial Development
Information and Siting Act, W.S. 35-12-101 through
35-12-119 35-12-120, shall apply only to the extent that
those provisions do not interfere with, contradict or
duplicate any requirements of the United States Nuclear
Regulatory Commission.

35-12-102. Definitions.

SF0134

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0266
(a) As used in this chapter:

(xvi) "Eligible entity" means the Wyoming game
and fish commission and the Wyoming wildlife and natural
resource trust account board.

35-12-105. Appointment and duties of administrator;
staff; rules and regulations.

(c) The director, administrator and the staff of the
division are authorized to the extent possible:,

(i) At the request of local governments, to
provide technical assistance to local governments in the
preparation of anticipated impacts related to a proposed
project consistent with W.S. 39-15-111(c) and (d) and
39-16-111(d) and (e) and negotiation of agreements with
applicants as provided for in W.S. 35-12-107;

(ii) At the request of an eligible entity, to
provide technical assistance to the eligible entity in the
preparation of anticipated impacts to wildlife related to a
proposed project, in providing recommendations under W.S.
SF0134

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0266
35-12-110(b) and for the negotiation of agreements with
applicants under W.S. 35-12-120.

35-12-110. Service of notice of application;
information and recommendations; application deficiencies;
procedure; jurisdiction; hearing.

(b) The division shall obtain information and
recommendations from the following state agencies relative
to the impact of the proposed facility as it applies to
each agency's area of expertise:

(xxiv) The Wyoming wildlife and natural resource
trust account board.

Section 3. This act shall apply to all industrial
facilities as defined in W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii) for which
the applicant receives a determination of jurisdiction from
the director of the department of environmental quality or
the administrator of the industrial siting division of the
department of environmental quality on and after July 1,
2025.

SF0134

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0266
Section 4. The industrial siting council shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.

Section 5.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(b) Sections 4 and 5 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
SF0134